Arkansas, session 2025, HB1872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-6-307(a), concerning the fees that may
be charged by a county sheriff, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following fees shall be charged by each of the sheriffs of the
several counties of the State of Arkansas:
(1) For serving or attempting to serve every summons, capias,
scire facias, attachment, writ of garnishment, writ of injunction, or
subpoena ............. $ 30.00;
(2) For serving a writ of execution, possession, ejectment, or
replevin ............. 100.00;
(3) For commission for receiving and paying money on execution
or process when lands or goods have been taken into custody, advertised, or
sold ............. 10%;
(4) For every return of a writ, summons, or subpoena, original
*JLL348*
03/20/2025 12:32:40 PM JLL348

HB1872
or judicial ............. 20.00;
(5) For executing a writ of inquiry ............. 20.00;
(6) For executing a certificate of purchase for real estate
under execution ............. 20.00;
(7) For making, executing, and subscribing a sheriff's deed to
be paid by purchaser ............. 30.00;
(8) For serving or attempting to serve each order, notice, or
rule of any court ............. 30.00;
(9) For serving or attempting to serve each notice to vacate
............. 30.00;
(10) For advertising goods or lands for sale .............
30.00;
(11) For returning each execution or attachment .............
20.00;
(12) For advertising elections in each voting precinct
............. 20.00;
(13) For delivering voter registration books for each voting
precinct ............. 20.00;
(14)(A) For serving warrant or order of arrest from any court
............. 50.00.
(B) A fee for serving a warrant or an order of arrest
shall be included in a court's judgment of conviction and sentencing order
under § 16-90-113(a);
(15) For taking and entering every bail or delivery bond
............. 20.00;
(16) For attending every trial of a criminal or civil case of
confession in open court ............. 20.00; and
(17) For serving subpoena for special jurors .............
20.00.







03/20/2025 12:32:40 PM JLL348